Utah statutes.
7-5-15.   Assets of trust company in possession of the commissioner.
With respect to a trust company in the possession of the commissioner under
Chapter 2, notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the assets held by the
trust company in a fiduciary capacity as a part of its trust business, as
defined in Section 7-5-1, are not subject to the claims of any secured or
unsecured creditor of the trust company.
